Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,113
Insolvent banks; liquidation expenses; allocation; certification.

The director shall from time to time allocate to the various banks in liquidation the expenses of the department by reason of such liquidation, other than the compensation and expense of the special deputy or assistant in charge and the fees for legal services directly incident to the bank in liquidation. The director shall certify to the various district courts of the counties in which the banks in process of liquidation are located the amount of the expenses allocated, which shall be taxed and paid as costs in the liquidation.

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 57, p. 164;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,128;

R.S.1943, § 8-199;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 113, p. 181;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 110.